New York, session 2025-2026, A1980.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 6 of section 11-0103 of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 777 of the laws of 3 1976, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. "Wildlife" means wild game and all other animal life existing in a 5 wild state, except companion animals as defined in section three hundred 6 fifty of the agriculture and markets law, fish, shellfish and crustacea. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04717-01-5